North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 3. Hospital Privileges.

§ 131E-85.
Hospital privileges and procedures.

The granting or denial of privileges to practice in hospitals to physicians licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, Article 1, dentists, optometrists, and podiatrists and the scope and delineation of such privileges shall be determined by the governing body of the hospital on a non-discriminatory basis. Such determinations shall be based upon the applicant’s education, training, experience, demonstrated competence and ability, and judgment and character of the applicant, and the reasonable objectives and regulations of the hospital, including, but not limited to appropriate utilization of hospital facilities, in which privileges are sought. Nothing in this Part shall be deemed to mandate hospitals to grant or deny to any such individuals or others privileges to practice in hospitals, or to offer or provide any type of care.

The procedures to be followed by a licensed hospital in considering applications of dentists, optometrists, and podiatrists for privileges to practice in such hospitals shall be similar to those applicable to applications of physicians licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, Article 1. Such procedures shall be available upon request.

In addition to the granting or denial of privileges, the governing body of each hospital may suspend, revoke, or modify privileges.

All applicants or individuals who have privileges shall comply with all applicable medical staff bylaws, rules and regulations, including the policies and procedures governing the qualifications of applicants and the scope and delineation of privileges.

The Department shall not issue or renew a license under this Article unless the applicant has demonstrated that the procedures followed in determining hospital privileges are in accordance with this Part and rules of the Department.

History.

1981, c. 659, s. 10; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 859, s. 18; 1989, c. 446; 1997-75, s. 2.

§ 131E-86.
Limited privileges.

It shall be unlawful for an individual who is not licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, Article 1, to admit a patient to a hospital without written proof in accordance with the policy of the governing body of the hospital that a physician licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, Article 1, who is a member of the medical staff will be responsible for the performance of a basic medical appraisal and for the medical needs of the patient. The governing body of a hospital may waive this requirement for a dentist licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, Article 2, to the extent authorized by this statute, who has successfully completed a postgraduate program in oral and maxillofacial surgery accredited by the American Dental Association.

The governing body of each hospital shall not grant privileges that exceed the scope of a license.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-87.
Reports of disciplinary action; immunity from liability.

The chief administrative officer of each licensed hospital in the State shall report to the appropriate occupational licensing board the details, as prescribed by the board, of any revocation, suspension, limitation, or voluntary reduction of privileges of a health care provider to practice in that hospital. Each hospital shall also report to the board its medical staff resignations. Reports concerning physician privileges and resignations shall be made in accordance with G.S. 90-14.13. Any person making a report required by this section shall be immune from any resulting criminal prosecution or civil liability unless the person knew the report was false or acted in reckless disregard of whether the report was false.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 859, s. 16; 2006-144, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-144, s. 9, effective October 1, 2006, substituted “limitation, or voluntary reduction” for “or limitation” in the first sentence; and added the third sentence.

§§ 131E-88,
131E-89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.